Washington statutes.
RCW 38.38.192

[Art. 21] Sentences of dismissal or dishonorable discharge to be approved by the governor.

In the organized militia not in federal service, no sentence of dismissal or dishonorable discharge may be executed until it is approved by the governor.

[ 1963 c 220 s 21.]